src-fst-stems-numerals.lexc.md
##  **LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES**
This lexicon contains a number of letters and other
symbols found in front of digits. Their continuation
lexicons should probably be changed as we restructure
the arabic numerals.


* **LEXICON ARABIC** arabic numerals























* **LEXICON ARABICLOOP**



* **LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD** ordinals




* **LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER**  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?








* **LEXICON ROMAN**  roman numerals

* **LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND**

* **LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED**

* **LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-TEN**

* **LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-ONE**

* **LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG**


* **LEXICON ROM-SPLIT**



* **LEXICON 2ROMAN**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-TEN**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-ONE**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROMNUMTAG**




* **LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP** some isolated numeral expressions






* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-bxr/blob/main/../src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc)</small>
